Illinois, session 104th, HB3202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Career and Technical Education Task Force. 8    (a) The Career and Technical Education Task Force is 9created within the State Board of Education to review career 10and technical education programming and policy and make 11recommendations to ensure all students have access to high 12quality, globally competitive career and technical educational 13programs. The Task Force shall examine the following:14        (1) the current capacity of career and technical 15    education programs in State high schools, community 16    colleges, and technical and vocational schools;17        (2) how much additional capacity is necessary to meet 18    student need;19        (3) whether current career and technical education 20    courses are current with the demands of the economy and 21    relevant to current and potential future employers;22        (4) a review of career and technical funding 23    structures;  HB3202- 2 -LRB104 08887 LNS 18942 b1        (5) the transportation needs of students in vocational 2    and technical education programs; and3        (6) other topics as determined by the Task Force 4    members.5    (b) The Task Force shall consist of all of the following 6members:7        (1) One member of the House of Representatives, 8    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.9        (2) One member of the House of Representatives, 10    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 11    Representatives.12        (3) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 13    President of the Senate.14        (4) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 15    Minority Leader of the Senate.16        (5) Three members representing trade unions, 17    recommended by an organization representing a 18    democratically governed federation of labor unions, 19    appointed by the Governor.20        (6) Two members who are school counselors, recommended 21    by a statewide organization representing school 22    counselors, appointed by the Governor.23        (7) One member from the State Board of Education, 24    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.25        (8) One high school principal, recommended by a 26    statewide organization representing principals, appointed   HB3202- 3 -LRB104 08887 LNS 18942 b1    by the Governor.2        (9) One superintendent of a school district that 3    maintains grades 9 through 12, recommended by a statewide 4    organization representing school administrators, 5    appointed by the Governor.6        (10) One chief school business official of a school 7    district that maintains grades 9 through 12, recommended 8    by a statewide organization representing school business 9    officials, appointed by the Governor.10        (11) One school board member of a school district that 11    maintains grades 9 through 12, recommended by a statewide 12    organization representing school boards, appointed by the 13    Governor.14        (12) Two educators who each represent a different 15    statewide professional teachers' organization, 16    recommended by each statewide professional teachers' 17    organization, appointed by the Governor.18        (13) One member representing nonprofit career and 19    technical education service providers, appointed by the 20    Governor.21    (c) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 22compensation.23    (d) The Task Force shall convene by December 1, 2025 and 24shall meet at a regular cadence and at the call of the State 25Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 26administrative support for the Task Force. The Task Force   HB3202- 4 -LRB104 08887 LNS 18942 b1shall prepare and deliver to the State Board of Education and 2the General Assembly a report covering the Task Force's 3findings.4    (e) The Task Force is dissolved, and this Section is 5repealed on January 1, 2027. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.